New York, session 2025-2026, S4469.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs a and c of subdivision 2 of section 2018-a of 2 the education law, as amended by chapter 541 of the laws of 2025, are 3 amended to read as follows: 4 a. A qualified voter may vote as an absentee voter under this section 5 if on the occurrence of an election such voter expects to be: 6 (1) absent from their county of residence; or 7 (2) unable to appear personally at the polling place because of 8 illness or physical disability, or duties related to the primary care of 9 one or more individuals who are ill or physically disabled, or because 10 such voter will be or is a patient in a hospital; or 11 (3) a resident or patient of a veteran's administration hospital; or 12 (4) absent from such voter's voting residence because such voter is 13 detained in jail awaiting action by a grand jury or awaiting trial, or 14 confined in jail or prison after a conviction for an offense other than 15 a felony, provided that such voter is qualified to vote in the election 16 district of such voter's residence[.]; or 17 (5) unable to be present due to such voter's observance of a religious 18 commitment or following such voter's religious teaching or tenet that 19 forbids secular activity on that day. 20 c. The application for an absentee ballot when filed must contain in 21 each instance the following information: 22 (1) Applicant's full name, date of birth, and residence address, 23 including the street and number, if any, rural delivery route, if any, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08446-02-6 S. 4469--A 2 1 mailing address if different from the residence address and an address 2 to which the ballot shall be mailed. 3 (2) A statement that the applicant is a qualified and registered 4 voter. 5 (3) A statement, as appropriate, that on the day of such election the 6 applicant expects in good faith to be in one of the following catego- 7 ries: 8 (a) absent from their county of residence; provided, however, if the 9 applicant expects to be absent from such county for a duration covering 10 more than one election and seeks an absentee ballot for each election, 11 such applicant shall state the dates when they expect to begin and end 12 such absence; or 13 (b) unable to appear at a polling place because of illness or physical 14 disability or duties related to the primary care of one or more individ- 15 uals who are ill or physically disabled; or 16 (c) a resident or patient of a veteran's administration hospital; or 17 (d) detained in jail awaiting action by a grand jury or awaiting trial 18 or confined in jail or prison after a conviction for an offense other 19 than a felony and stating the place where such applicant is so detained 20 or confined[.]; or 21 (e) unable to be present due to such voter's observance of a religious 22 commitment or following such voter's religious teaching or tenet that 23 forbids secular activity on that day. 24 § 2. Paragraph a of subdivision 2 of section 2018-b of the education 25 law, as amended by chapter 541 of the laws of 2025, is amended to read 26 as follows: 27 a. An applicant for such an absentee ballot shall submit an applica- 28 tion setting forth: 29 (1) such applicant's full name, date of birth and residence address, 30 including the street and number, if any, or town and rural delivery 31 route, if any, mailing address if different from the residence address 32 and an address to which the ballot shall be mailed; 33 (2) that such applicant is or will be, on the day of the school 34 district election, a qualified voter of the school district; 35 (3) a statement, as appropriate, that on the day of such election the 36 applicant expects in good faith to be in one of the following catego- 37 ries: 38 (a) a resident or patient in a hospital, including a veteran's admin- 39 istration hospital, or unable to appear personally at the polling place 40 on such day because of illness or physical disability, or duties related 41 to the primary care of one or more individuals who are ill or physically 42 disabled; or 43 (b) absent from the county of such applicant's residence; provided, 44 however, if the applicant expects to be absent from such county for a 45 duration covering more than one election and seeks an absentee ballot 46 for each election, such applicant shall state the dates when they expect 47 to begin and end such absence; or 48 (c) detained in jail awaiting action by a grand jury or awaiting trial 49 or confined in jail or prison after a conviction for an offense other 50 than a felony and stating the place where such applicant is so detained 51 or confined[.]; or 52 (d) unable to be present due to such applicant's observance of a reli- 53 gious commitment, or following such applicant's religious teaching or 54 tenet that forbids secular activity on that day. 55 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.